Hawaii statutes.
§167-23 Molokai irrigation system
water users advisory board; establishment; meetings. (a) There is
established a Molokai irrigation system water users advisory board, to be
appointed by the governor under section 26-34. The advisory board shall consist
of seven members, as follows:

(1) A homestead farmer user on Molokai;

(2) A nonhomestead farmer user on Molokai;

(3) The designee (by name rather than office) of the
Molokai County Farm Bureau;

(4) The designee (by name rather than office) of
Hikiola Cooperative, Inc.;

(5) The designee (by name rather than office) of the
Molokai-Lanai soil and water conservation district;

(6) A homestead farmer user whose nomination has been
recommended by Moku Puni O Molokai, as determined pursuant to a process established
by that organization, and approved for submittal to the governor by majority
vote of all homesteaders then serving on the advisory board; and

(7) The supervisor of the Molokai district office of
the department of Hawaiian home lands who shall serve as an ex officio voting
member.

(b) All members of the advisory board shall
be:

(1) Molokai irrigation system users or their agents,
officers, or employees; and

(2) Residents of the island of Molokai.

(c) The members of the advisory board shall serve
without compensation, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary
expenses, including travel expenses, while attending meetings and while in the
discharge of their duties. For administrative purposes, and pursuant to
section 26-35, the advisory board shall be placed within the department of
agriculture.

(d) The advisory board shall meet with the
department of agriculture at least six times each year. The meetings shall be
held on Molokai, whenever possible.

The advisory board's duties and
responsibilities shall be to:

(1) Advise the department of agriculture on matters
of concern to the users of the system;

(2) Provide support for improvements to the
irrigation facilities;

(3) Participate in the long-range planning of the
system; and

(4) Act as liaison between the users and the
department of agriculture.

(e) Four members of the advisory board shall
constitute a quorum at any meeting. No member of the advisory board shall be
qualified to act in matters directly involving a company or organization of
which the advisory board member is an officer, director, member, or full-time
employee, or to which the advisory board member is indebted.

(f) For the purpose of this section:

"Homestead farmer user" means an
individual who qualifies under the requirements set forth in the department of
Hawaiian home lands administrative rules, farms a homestead parcel owned by the
department of Hawaiian home lands, and is served by the Molokai irrigation
system.

"Kupuna homestead farmer user" means
an individual who resides on a homestead parcel on Molokai, with a Molokai
irrigation system water meter. The individual shall be a former or current
farmer who is working or has worked in the agricultural industry on Molokai. [L
1992, c 131, §3; am L 2010, c 154, §1; am L 2016, c 175, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next